dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 6544 N 1
SFX 6544 0 dekiyim .

SFX 6545 N 1
SFX 6545 0 incedir .

SFX 6546 N 1
SFX 6546 0 inizdeydim .

SFX 6547 N 1
SFX 6547 0 lerdeyizdir .

SFX 6548 N 1
SFX 6548 0 lerdeysem .

SFX 6549 N 1
SFX 6549 0 mdin .

SFX 6550 N 1
SFX 6550 0 larınınkileriyle .

SFX 6551 N 1
SFX 6551 0 lardakilerine .

SFX 6552 N 1
SFX 6552 0 larımdakine .

SFX 6553 N 1
SFX 6553 0 larımızdakilerle .

SFX 6554 N 1
SFX 6554 0 'imizi .

SFX 6555 N 1
SFX 6555 0 lerimdeydim .

SFX 6556 N 1
SFX 6556 0 lerimdeyim .

SFX 6557 N 1
SFX 6557 0 lerimdeyken .

SFX 6558 N 1
SFX 6558 0 lerimizdeyken .

SFX 6559 N 1
SFX 6559 0 lardansam .

SFX 6560 N 1
SFX 6560 0 lardayımdır .

SFX 6561 N 1
SFX 6561 0 suymuşsun .

SFX 6562 N 1
SFX 6562 0 ınızındır .

SFX 6563 N 1
SFX 6563 0 dayızdır .

SFX 6564 N 1
SFX 6564 0 lardalardı .

SFX 6565 N 1
SFX 6565 0 umuzdaydık .

SFX 6566 N 1
SFX 6566 0 umuzdayız .

SFX 6567 N 1
SFX 6567 0 suysam .

SFX 6568 N 1
SFX 6568 0 sunudur .

SFX 6569 N 1
SFX 6569 0 'ımıza .

SFX 6570 N 1
SFX 6570 0 sininkiyse .

SFX 6571 N 1
SFX 6571 0 dakilerinin .

SFX 6572 N 1
SFX 6572 0 dakileriyle .

SFX 6573 N 1
SFX 6573 0 'ınkileri .

SFX 6574 N 1
SFX 6574 0 'ladır .

SFX 6575 N 1
SFX 6575 0 rduysa .

SFX 6576 N 1
SFX 6576 0 'unsa .

SFX 6577 N 1
SFX 6577 0 rmüşçesine .

SFX 6578 N 1
SFX 6578 0 ümdendi .

SFX 6579 N 1
SFX 6579 0 eyizdir .

SFX 6580 N 1
SFX 6580 0 eymişim .

SFX 6581 N 1
SFX 6581 0 lercemizi .

SFX 6582 N 1
SFX 6582 0 lercesininse .

SFX 6583 N 1
SFX 6583 0 lercesiyse .

SFX 6584 N 1
SFX 6584 0 ümüzdendi .

SFX 6585 N 1
SFX 6585 0 ümüzdenmiş .

SFX 6586 N 1
SFX 6586 0 ümüzdense .

SFX 6587 N 1
SFX 6587 0 ünüzdenmiş .

SFX 6588 N 1
SFX 6588 0 yedirler .

SFX 6589 N 1
SFX 6589 0 ımızınkini .

SFX 6590 N 1
SFX 6590 0 mım .

SFX 6591 N 1
SFX 6591 0 mımız .

SFX 6592 N 1
SFX 6592 0 mına .

SFX 6593 N 1
SFX 6593 0 mınaymış .

SFX 6594 N 1
SFX 6594 0 mında .

SFX 6595 N 1
SFX 6595 0 mındaki .

SFX 6596 N 1
SFX 6596 0 mından .

SFX 6597 N 1
SFX 6597 0 mını .

SFX 6598 N 1
SFX 6598 0 mının .

SFX 6599 N 1
SFX 6599 0 mınızı .

SFX 6600 N 1
SFX 6600 0 mınızın .

SFX 6601 N 1
SFX 6601 0 mıyla .

SFX 6602 N 1
SFX 6602 0 nıma .

SFX 6603 N 1
SFX 6603 0 nımca .

SFX 6604 N 1
SFX 6604 0 nımdan .

SFX 6605 N 1
SFX 6605 0 nımıza .

SFX 6606 N 1
SFX 6606 0 nımızca .

SFX 6607 N 1
SFX 6607 0 nımızdan .

SFX 6608 N 1
SFX 6608 0 nınca .

SFX 6609 N 1
SFX 6609 0 nında .

SFX 6610 N 1
SFX 6610 0 nındaki .

SFX 6611 N 1
SFX 6611 0 nındakilerin .

SFX 6612 N 1
SFX 6612 0 nından .

SFX 6613 N 1
SFX 6613 0 nındaydım .

SFX 6614 N 1
SFX 6614 0 nındayım .

SFX 6615 N 1
SFX 6615 0 nını .

SFX 6616 N 1
SFX 6616 0 nının .

SFX 6617 N 1
SFX 6617 0 nınız .

SFX 6618 N 1
SFX 6618 0 nınızdan .

SFX 6619 N 1
SFX 6619 0 nınızı .

SFX 6620 N 1
SFX 6620 0 ımızaydı .

SFX 6621 N 1
SFX 6621 0 leydiyseniz .

SFX 6622 N 1
SFX 6622 0 mine .

SFX 6623 N 1
SFX 6623 0 lerdekilerdir .

SFX 6624 N 1
SFX 6624 0 unayız .

SFX 6625 N 1
SFX 6625 0 undalardır .

SFX 6626 N 1
SFX 6626 0 undayımdır .
