dictionaries/tr/index.dic
Yiğit/35,38,303,304,305,306,981,1342,3701,6554
yirmi/9999,2,3,5,6,7,8,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,254,255,256,257,259,260,283,284,286,313,314,315,328,333,335,349,363,367,369,385,386,390,424,1243,1260,1326,1491,1531,2455,4584,6555,6556,6557,6558
yo/13,14,15,17,20,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,53,54,55,57,59,63,64,65,90,123,125,128,224,430,441,446,448,516,517,524,534,586,782,827,834,835,845,1093,1343,1434,1435,1629,1630,1632,1640,2017,2018,2019,2020,2022,2023,2024,2113,2114,2284,6568
yoksul/13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,59,117,121,122,123,124,125,128,141,178,192,193,209,223,224,430,437,441,511,563,583,592,661,662,926,934,1061,1067,1071,1176,1177,1782,1899,1900,1910,2111,2530,3357,6559
yolculuk/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,59,91,121,122,123,124,125,128,141,178,223,224,428,430,431,432,433,434,437,439,440,441,442,514,515,524,576,577,582,585,625,734,787,792,796,799,804,861,866,867,868,877,1177,1418,1646,2171,6560
Yozgat/217,222,228,230,1663,1713,6569
yu/17,141,192,200,218,510,563,611,634,661,733,854,1124,1177,1610,1900,4203,5660,5661,5662,6575
Yunanistan/217,219,222,225,229,230,320,519,1333,2006,2007,2008,2009,6573,6574
Yusuf/217,225,228,663,1338,6576
zahiri/9999,2,6,7,35,38,39,257,6588
zam/13,14,15,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,51,55,56,59,74,117,121,123,125,126,128,186,435,439,524,796,802,804,879,984,6590,6591,6592,6593,6594,6595,6596,6597,6598,6599,6600,6601
zan/13,14,15,16,20,22,23,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,51,57,70,123,125,126,128,174,430,432,464,577,932,985,1059,2790,5253,5254,5255,5256,5257,6195,6602,6603,6604,6605,6606,6607,6608,6609,6610,6611,6612,6613,6614,6615,6616,6617,6618,6619
zehir/9999,2,3,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,105,255,256,263,283,284,328,333,335,339,341,365,374,383,384,718,1183,1360,2462,2574,2787,6621
zem/9999,38,105,6622
zihin/9999,1,2,3,4,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,254,255,256,283,284,319,326,329,330,331,332,333,335,336,339,341,361,363,364,365,370,371,373,374,377,381,382,420,491,493,659,719,1229,1235,1237,1260,1329,2455,2460,3253,3278,6623
